Massachusetts, session 194th, H2830.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 4 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the first sentence of subsection (2) 
paragraph (b) the following:- 
For the purposes of creditable service, time served as a call firefighter, emergency 
medical technician (EMT), or police dispatcher shall be included, provided that such individual 
has been compensated for such service.